Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 2. Vacancies

§ 22-29-201.
Vacancies.

A director’s office shall be deemed to be vacant upon the occurrence of any one (1) of the following events prior to the expiration of the term of office:

If for any reason a properly qualified person is not elected to a director’s office by the voters as required at a regular election;

If a person who was duly elected or appointed fails, neglects or refuses to subscribe to an oath of office or to furnish the bond as may be required in the principal act;

If a person who was duly elected or appointed submits a written resignation to the board of directors and the resignation has been duly accepted by the board of directors;

If the person who was duly elected or appointed ceases to be qualified for the office to which he was elected;

If a person who was duly elected or appointed is found guilty of a felony;

If a court of competent jurisdiction voids the election or appointment or removes the person duly elected or appointed for any cause whatsoever, but only after his right to appeal has been waived or otherwise exhausted;

If the person who was duly elected or appointed fails to attend three (3) consecutive regular meetings of the board of directors without the board of directors having entered upon its minutes an approval for at least one (1) of those absences. This provision shall not apply to instances where failure to attend the meetings was due to a temporary mental or physical disability or illness;

If the person who was duly elected or appointed dies during his term of office;

If declared vacant by the board of county commissioners upon the failure of the district board to comply with W.S. 9-1-507(a)(vii) on or before December 30 of that same calendar year, after notice is given as provided by W.S. 9-1-507(j).

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-29-202.
Filling by appointment.

A vacancy in a district director office shall be filled by appointment by a majority of the remaining directors. However, if a vacancy exists in a majority of the offices of director, or if a majority of the directors cannot agree on an appointment, then notice of the vacancy shall be given to the county commission by either a district director or district member. The county commission shall fill the vacancy within thirty (30) days of being notified or by the time specified in the principal act. If the county commission finds that a vacancy exists in a majority of offices of director or that a majority of the directors cannot agree on an appointment, the county commission may fill the vacancy by acting on its own motion without notice.

All appointments shall be evidenced by an appropriate entry in the minutes of the meeting at which the appointment was made.

An appointee to the office of director shall serve until the next regular election.

The appointed person before undertaking the duties of office shall take an oath of office in accordance with W.S.

22-29-118

.

The term of office of an appointed director begins on the day the appointee accepts the appointment unless the letter of resignation of the prior incumbent specifies a later date, which date then shall be the beginning of the appointee’s term.

Any vacancy created by failure of the board to comply with W.S. 9-1-507(a)(vii) shall be filled by appointment by the board of county commissioners for the sole purpose of acting as trustee to dissolve the district without election pursuant to W.S.

22-29-401

et seq.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 1.